Tennessee, session 114, SB2631.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 46-1-111(a), is amended by deleting
the first sentence and substituting:
A record must be kept of every burial in the cemetery of the cemetery company,
showing the date of burial and name of the person buried, together with the
designation of lot or space in which the burial was made, including the precise
geographical location using latitudinal and longitudinal coordinates. A copy of
this record must be transmitted to the funeral establishment, as defined under §
62-5-101, responsible for the arrangements of the person buried at the interment
site within fifteen (15) days after the date of burial.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2027, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2631
012416
- 1 -